src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                      Lule Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !


! ======================
!! # Sublexica for Verb
! ======================

!! Table of content:

!! * The auxiliaries
!!     - Negation verb
!!     - Copula
!!     - Modals
!! * Main verbs
!!     - Even syllable stems
!!         - Intransitives
!!         - Transitives
!!     - Odd syllable stems
!!         - Intranstives
!!         - Transitives
!!     - Contracted stems
!!         - Intransitives
!!         - Transitives
!!     - Assimilated loan verbs
!!         - Intransitives
!!         - Transitives
!!     - Main inflectional categories
!!         - suffix lexicas
!!     - Verb derivation


!! IV means intransitive verbs, TV means transitive verbs.


!! # Auxiliary verbs
! ---------------


!! ## Negation verb 
! - - - -


LEXICON NEG !!= @CODE@
          +Ind+Prs+Sg1:iv      K-CONS ;
          +Ind+Prs+Sg2:i       K-VOW  ;
          +Ind+Prs+Sg3:ij      K-CONS ;
          +Ind+Prs+Du1:en      K-CONS ;
 +Err/Orth+Ind+Prs+Du1:æn      K-CONS ; !
          +Ind+Prs+Du2:æhppe   K-VOW  ;
          +Ind+Prs+Du3:æbá     K-VOW  ;
          +Ind+Prs+Pl1:ep      K-CONS ;
 +Err/Orth+Ind+Prs+Pl1:æp      K-CONS ; !
          +Ind+Prs+Pl2:ehpit   K-CONS ;
          +Ind+Prs+Pl3:e       K-VOW  ;
 +Err/Orth+Ind+Prs+Pl3:æ       K-VOW  ; !

          +Ind+Prt+Sg1:ittjiv  K-CONS ;
          +Ind+Prt+Sg2:ittji   K-VOW  ;
          +Ind+Prt+Sg3:ittjij  K-CONS ;
 +Err/Orth+Ind+Prt+Sg3:ittij   K-CONS ;

          +Ind+Prt+Du1:ejma    K-VOW  ;
          +Ind+Prt+Du1+Err/Orth:ejme    K-VOW  ;
          +Ind+Prt+Du2:ejda    K-VOW  ;
          +Ind+Prt+Du3:ejga    K-VOW  ;
          +Ind+Prt+Pl1:ejma    K-VOW  ;
          +Ind+Prt+Pl1+Err/Orth:ejme    K-VOW  ;
          +Ind+Prt+Pl2:ejda    K-VOW  ;
          +Ind+Prt+Pl3:ettjin  K-CONS ;
 +Err/Orth+Ind+Prt+Pl3:etjin   K-CONS ;


            +Imprt+Sg2:ale     ENDLEX ;
            +Imprt+Sg3:allis   ENDLEX ;
            +Imprt+Du1:allon   ENDLEX ;
            +Imprt+Du2:alºle   ENDLEX ;
            +Imprt+Du3:alliska ENDLEX ;
            +Imprt+Pl1:allop   ENDLEX ;
            +Imprt+Pl2:allit   ENDLEX ;
            +Imprt+Pl3:allisa  ENDLEX ;

          +ImprtII+Sg2:allu    ENDLEX ;
          +ImprtII+Sg3:allus   ENDLEX ;
          +ImprtII+Du1:allun   ENDLEX ;
          +ImprtII+Du2:alluda  ENDLEX ;
          +ImprtII+Du3:alluska ENDLEX ;
          +ImprtII+Pl1:allup   ENDLEX ;
          +ImprtII+Pl2:allut   ENDLEX ;
          +ImprtII+Pl3:allusa  ENDLEX ;


!! ## Copula
! - - - -

LEXICON ÅRROT !!= @CODE@
       +Inf:ro%>t   K-CONS ;
 +Imprt+Sg2:o%>     ENDLEX ;
 +Imprt+Sg3:ru%>s   ENDLEX ;
 +Imprt+Du1:ro%>n   ENDLEX ;
 +Imprt+Du2:ºro%>   ENDLEX ;
 +Imprt+Du3:ru%>ska ENDLEX ;
 +Imprt+Pl1:ro%>p   ENDLEX ;
 +Imprt+Pl2:ru%>t   ENDLEX ;
 +Imprt+Pl3:ru%>sa  ENDLEX ;
